Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-6,107
Accidents; Department of Health and Human Services; Department of Transportation; adopt rules and regulations.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt necessary rules and regulations for the administration of the provisions of sections 60-6,101 to 60-6,106.

(2) The Department of Transportation shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which shall provide for the release and disclosure of the results of tests conducted under sections 60-6,102 and 60-6,103.

Laws 1974, LB 66, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,104.12;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 203;

Laws 1993, LB 590, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 283;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 233;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 191.